src/fst/morphology/affixes/suffixes.lexc
LEXICON Noun_symbols_possibly_inflected ! ad hoc to make compile.
# ;

LEXICON Noun_symbols_never_inflected ! ad hoc to make compile.
# ;

! Prefixes can stack ('manĝ-eg-igi,' to feed someone greatly), so design decisions
!   must be made as to which ones should combine ('manĝeble' is edible, but 'manĝ-et-end-i-o' is 'the land of mandatorily small food')
!   and how order constraints ('manĝ-aĉ-et-o:' 'small, awful food' versus 'manĝ-et-aĉ-o:'awful, small food') are to be handled.

! Additionally, should prefixes be constrained in any arbitrary way, like only directing to adjective/noun/adverb endings, or should
!   all direct to root?

LEXICON Suffix !add links to roots and so forth
+Suff:aĉ      R-pos;!'(pejorative)'
+Suff:ad      R-pos;!'repeated or continual action'
+Suff:aĵ      R-pos;!'concrete manifestation of'
+Suff:an      R-pos;!'member/inhabitant/participant of'
+Suff:ar      R-pos;!'unnumbered group of'
!+Suff:ĉj      R-pos;!'(masculine affectionate)' ! This one changes the stem, so it'll require some special work. "patro" --> "paĉjo"
+Suff:ebl     R-pos;!'able to be, possible'
+Suff:ec      R-pos;!'abstract quality of'
+Suff:eg      R-pos;!'augmentative'
+Suff:ej      R-pos;!'place characterized by'
+Suff:em      R-pos;!'having propensity to, tendency of'
+Suff:end     R-pos;!'mandatory'
+Suff:er      R-pos;!'the smallest part of'
+Suff:estr    R-pos;!'boss/leader'
+Suff:et      R-pos;!'diminutive'
+Suff:i       R-pos;!"country of"
+Suff:id      R-pos;!'child of'
+Suff:ig      R-pos;!'causative, transitivizer'
+Suff:iĝ      R-pos;!'to become, intransitivizer'
+Suff:il      R-pos;!'tool'
+Suff:in      R-pos;!'female'
+Suff:ind     R-pos;!'worthy of'
+Suff:ing     R-pos;!'holder, sheath'
+Suff:ism     R-pos;!'doctrine, system of'
+Suff:ist     R-pos;!'professionally occupied doing'
!+Suff:nj      R-pos;!'female affectionate' ! Like ĉj, this also needs some special help, as it modifies the root
+Suff:obl     R-pos;!'multiple'
+Suff:on      R-pos;!'fraction of'
+Suff:op      R-pos;!'group of specific number'
+Suff:uj      R-pos;!"country (see also 'i'), container of"
+Suff:ul      R-pos;!'person characterized by'
+Suff:um      R-pos;!'(undefined suffix, usage varies)'

!Tests:
!!€gt-desc: suffixes
!!€ kirkano:    kirk+R+Suff+N+Sing+Nom
!!€ manĝemaj:   manĝ+R+Suff+Adj+Plu+Nom
!!€ germanujon: german+R+Suff+N+Sing+Acc
!!€ kristismo:  krist+R+Suff+N+Sing+Nom
!!€ kredeble:   kred+R+Suff+Adv
